Nevada, session 83, SB457.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 1.3. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 432B.042.
(c) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(d) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
[(c)] (e) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed
pursuant to chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS
629.031, a clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where
health care is provided.
[(d)] (f) “Hospitality employee” means a person employed by a
resort hotel, resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention
center, including, without limitation, a person who is employed in
a position of front desk staff, housekeeping, concierge, valet, bell
service, gaming floor, food and beverage, retail, security, facility
or hotel administration, count room, management or any other
position who is responsible for ensuring a positive guest
experience, and whose employment duties require the employee to:
(1) Wear identification, clothing, a uniform or other
insignia that identifies the employee as working for a resort hotel,
resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention center; and
(2) Be physically on the property of the resort hotel, resort
condominium, arena, stadium or convention center or otherwise
traveling within a corridor, as described in section 65.5 of this act.
(g) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 7 –
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(I) Interacts with the public; and
(II) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or
child protective services or tasks that expose the person to
comparable dangers;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (11) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(e)] (h) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
-
*SB457_R1*

– 8 –
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
[(f)] (i) “Resort hotel” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 463.01865.
(j) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
[(g)] (k) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(h)] (l) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(i)] (m) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(j)] (n) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(k)] (o) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(l)] (p) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 9 –
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a hospitality employee, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator or a utility worker who is
performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a hospitality employee, a provider of health
care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility
worker or a sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
(I) An officer, a hospitality employee, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator or a utility worker who is
performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
-
*SB457_R1*

– 10 –
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a hospitality
employee, a provider of health care, a school employee, a taxicab
driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 200.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.481 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” means any willful and unlawful use of force or
violence upon the person of another.
(b) “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
(c) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 432B.042.
(d) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(e) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
[(d)] (f) “Hospitality employee” means a person employed by a
resort hotel, resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention
center, including, without limitation, a person who is employed in
a position of front desk staff, housekeeping, concierge, valet, bell
service, gaming floor, food and beverage, retail, security, facility
or hotel administration, count room, management or any other
position who is responsible for ensuring a positive guest
experience, and whose employment duties require the employee to:
(1) Wear identification, clothing, a uniform or other
insignia that identifies the employee as working for a resort hotel,
resort condominium, arena, stadium or convention center; and
(2) Be physically on the property of the resort hotel, resort
condominium, arena, stadium or convention center or otherwise
traveling within a corridor, as described in section 65.5 of this act.
(g) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard, matron or other correctional officer of a
city or county jail or detention facility;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 11 –
(5) A prosecuting attorney of an agency or political
subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including,
without limitation, a person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed
in this subparagraph;
(7) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
(8) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(I) Interacts with the public; and
(II) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or
child protective services or tasks that expose the person to
comparable dangers;
(9) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law enforcement
agency whose official duties require the employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (11) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(e)] (h) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 200.471.
[(f)] (i) “Resort hotel” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 463.01865.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 12 –
(j) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281.
[(g)] (k) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(h)] (l) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(i)] (m) “Strangulation” means intentionally applying
sufficient pressure to another person to make it difficult or
impossible for the person to breathe, including, without limitation,
applying pressure to the neck, throat or windpipe that may prevent
or hinder breathing or reduce the intake of air, or applying any
pressure to the neck on either side of the windpipe, but not the
windpipe itself, to stop the flow of blood to the brain via the carotid
arteries.
[(j)] (n) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(k)] (o) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(l)] (p) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(m)] (q) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 200.485, a person
convicted of a battery, other than a battery committed by an adult
upon a child which constitutes child abuse, shall be punished:
(a) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and no
substantial bodily harm to the victim results, except under
circumstances where a greater penalty is provided in this section or
NRS 197.090, for a misdemeanor.
(b) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and
either substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the battery is
committed by strangulation, for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If:
(1) The battery is committed upon:
(I) An officer, hospitality employee, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator or utility worker who was performing
his or her duty;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 13 –
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event;
(2) The officer, hospitality employee, provider of health care,
school employee, taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or
sports official suffers substantial bodily harm or the battery is
committed by strangulation; and
(3) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, hospitality employee, provider of health care,
school employee, taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or
sports official,
 for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the battery:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, hospitality employee, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator or utility worker who is performing
his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, hospitality employee, provider of health care,
school employee, taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or
sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, except under circumstances where a
greater penalty is provided in this section.
(e) If the battery is committed with the use of a deadly weapon,
and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 14 –
(f) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, without the use of
a deadly weapon, whether or not substantial bodily harm results and
whether or not the battery is committed by strangulation, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years.
(g) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, with the use of a
deadly weapon, and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 2. NRS 200.575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.575 1. A person who, without lawful authority, willfully
or maliciously engages in a course of conduct directed towards a
victim that would cause a reasonable person under similar
circumstances to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, harassed or
fearful for his or her immediate safety or the immediate safety of a
family or household member [,] or a person with whom the victim
has had or is having a dating relationship, and that actually causes
the victim to feel terrorized, frightened, intimidated, harassed or
fearful for his or her immediate safety or the immediate safety of a
family or household member [,] or a person with whom the victim
has had or is having a dating relationship, commits the crime of
stalking. Except where the provisions of subsection 2, 3 or 4 are
applicable, a person who commits the crime of stalking:
(a) For the first offense, is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(b) For the second offense, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
(c) For the third or any subsequent offense, is guilty of a
category C felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a
maximum term of not more than 5 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 or 4 and unless
a more severe penalty is prescribed by law, a person who commits
the crime of stalking where the victim is under the age of 16 and the
person is 5 or more years older than the victim:
(a) For the first offense, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 15 –
(b) For the second offense, is guilty of a category C felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 5 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
(c) For the third or any subsequent offense, is guilty of a
category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, and may be further
punished by a fine of not more than $5,000.
3. A person who commits the crime of stalking and in
conjunction therewith threatens the person with the intent to cause
the person to be placed in reasonable fear of death or substantial
bodily harm commits the crime of aggravated stalking. A person
who commits the crime of aggravated stalking shall be punished for
a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 15 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
4. A person who commits the crime of stalking [with the use of
an Internet or network site, electronic mail, text messaging or any
other similar means of communication] by electronic means to
publish, display or distribute information in a manner that
substantially increases the risk of harm or violence to the victim
shall be punished for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
5. If any act engaged in by a person was part of the course of
conduct that constitutes the crime of stalking and was initiated or
had an effect on the victim in this State, the person may be
prosecuted in this State.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
200.571, a criminal penalty provided for in this section may be
imposed in addition to any penalty that may be imposed for any
other criminal offense arising from the same conduct or for any
contempt of court arising from the same conduct.
7. If the court finds that a person convicted of stalking pursuant
to this section committed the crime against a person listed in
subsection 1 of NRS 33.018 and that the victim has an ongoing,
reasonable fear of physical harm, the court shall enter the finding in
its judgment of conviction or admonishment of rights.
8. If the court includes such a finding in a judgment of
conviction or admonishment of rights issued pursuant to this
section, the court shall:
-
*SB457_R1*

– 16 –
(a) Inform the person convicted that he or she is prohibited from
owning, possessing or having under his or her control or custody
any firearm pursuant to NRS 202.360; and
(b) Order the person convicted to permanently surrender, sell or
transfer any firearm that he or she owns or that is in his or her
possession or under his or her custody or control in the manner set
forth in NRS 202.361.
9. A person who violates any provision included in a judgment
of conviction or admonishment of rights issued pursuant to this
section concerning the surrender, sale, transfer, ownership,
possession, custody or control of a firearm is guilty of a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000. The court must include in the judgment of
conviction or admonishment of rights a statement that a violation of
such a provision in the judgment or admonishment is a category B
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
10. The penalties provided in this section do not preclude the
victim from seeking any other legal remedy available.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Act” includes, without limitation, accessing a social media
account of a specified person.
(b) “Course of conduct” means [a pattern of conduct which
consists of] two or more acts conducted in person or by electronic
means over a period of time that evidences a continuity of purpose
directed at a specific person.
[(b)] (c) “Dating relationship” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 33.018.
(d) “Electronic means” includes, without limitation, through
the use of an Internet or network site, a social media
communication, electronic mail, text messaging or any other
similar means of communication used to electronically publish,
display or distribute information.
(e) “Family or household member” means a spouse, a former
spouse, a parent or other person who is related by blood or marriage
or is or was actually residing with the person.
[(c)] (f) “Internet or network site” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 205.4744.
[(d)] (g) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4745.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 17 –
[(e)] (h) “Offense” includes, without limitation, a violation of
the law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or similar
conduct set forth in this section.
(i) “Social media communication” means:
(1) A private communication, including, without limitation,
a message or image, sent between users of a social media
platform; or
(2) A communication, including, without limitation, a
message or image, which is made available or otherwise shared on
a social media platform and which is visible to other users of the
social media platform or the public.
[(f)] (j) “Text messaging” means a communication in the form
of electronic text or one or more electronic images sent from a
telephone or computer to another person’s telephone or computer by
addressing the communication to the recipient’s telephone number.
[(g)] (k) “Without lawful authority” includes acts which are
initiated or continued without the victim’s consent. The term does
not include acts which are otherwise protected or authorized by
constitutional or statutory law, regulation or order of a court of
competent jurisdiction, including, but not limited to:
(1) Picketing which occurs during a strike, work stoppage or
any other labor dispute.
(2) The activities of a reporter, photographer, camera
operator or other person while gathering information for
communication to the public if that person is employed or engaged
by or has contracted with a newspaper, periodical, press association
or radio or television station and is acting solely within that
professional capacity.
(3) The activities of a person that are carried out in the
normal course of his or her lawful employment.
(4) Any activities carried out in the exercise of the
constitutionally protected rights of freedom of speech and assembly.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 200.620 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.620 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and
NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive, 209.419 and 704.195, it is
unlawful for any person to intercept or attempt to intercept any wire
communication unless:
(a) The interception or attempted interception is made with the
prior consent of one of the parties to the communication; and
(b) An emergency situation exists and it is impractical to obtain
a court order as required by NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive,
before the interception, in which event the interception is subject to
the requirements of subsection 3. If the application for ratification is
denied, any use or disclosure of the information so intercepted is
-
*SB457_R1*

– 18 –
unlawful, and the person who made the interception shall notify the
sender and the receiver of the communication that:
(1) The communication was intercepted; and
(2) Upon application to the court, ratification of the
interception was denied.
2. This section does not apply to any person, or to the officers,
employees or agents of any person, engaged in the business of
providing service and facilities for wire communication where the
interception or attempted interception is to construct, maintain,
conduct or operate the service or facilities of that person.
3. Any person who has made an interception in an emergency
situation as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall, within
72 hours of the interception, make a written application to a justice
of the Supreme Court or district judge for ratification of the
interception. The interception must not be ratified unless the
applicant shows that:
(a) An emergency situation existed and it was impractical to
obtain a court order before the interception; and
(b) Except for the absence of a court order, the interception met
the requirements of NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive.
4. NRS 200.610 to 200.690, inclusive, do not prohibit the
recording, and NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive, do not prohibit
the reception in evidence, of conversations on wire communications
installed in the office of an official law enforcement or fire-fighting
agency, or a public utility, if the equipment used for the recording is
installed in a facility for wire communications or on a telephone
with a number listed in a directory, on which emergency calls or
requests by a person for response by the law enforcement or fire-
fighting agency or public utility are likely to be received. In
addition, those sections do not prohibit the recording or reception in
evidence of conversations initiated by the law enforcement or fire-
fighting agency or public utility from such a facility or telephone in
connection with responding to the original call or request, if the
agency or public utility informs the other party that the conversation
is being recorded.
5. The interception or attempted interception of a wire
communication is not unlawful under the circumstances set forth in
subsection 1 of NRS 179.463 [.] or section 60.3 of this act.
Sec. 3. NRS 200.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.730 [A]
1. Subject to subsection 2, a person who knowingly and
willfully [has in his or her possession] possesses for any purpose
any film, photograph or other visual presentation depicting a person
under the age of 16 years as the subject of a sexual portrayal or
-
*SB457_R1*

– 19 –
engaging in or simulating, or assisting others to engage in or
simulate, sexual conduct:
[1.] (a) For the first offense, is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $5,000.
[2.] (b) For any subsequent offense, is guilty of a category A
felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of life
with the possibility of parole, and may be further punished by a fine
of not more than $5,000.
2. Each person under the age of 16 years depicted in any
film, photograph or other visual presentation described in
subsection 1 constitutes a separate offense for purposes of this
section.
Sec. 4. Chapter 202 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a court orders a person to surrender, sell or transfer any
firearm pursuant to NRS 202.361, the court shall require the
person to appear for a compliance hearing to determine whether
the person has complied with the provisions of the order for the
surrender, sale or transfer of the firearm.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the court
shall schedule the compliance hearing not earlier than 2 business
days nor later than 5 business days after the issuance of the order
for the surrender, sale or transfer of the firearm.
3. If a person is in custody at the time that the compliance
hearing is scheduled pursuant to subsection 2, the court shall
reschedule the compliance hearing to a date that is not later than
1 business day after the release of the person from custody.
4. The court may cancel the compliance hearing if:
(a) The person provides the affidavit described in paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 of NRS 202.361;
(b) The person provides the receipt or other documentation
required by subsection 2, 3 or 4 of NRS 202.361, as applicable; or
(c) The court issues a search warrant pursuant to subsection 5
of NRS 202.361.
Sec. 5. NRS 202.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
202.253 As used in NRS 202.253 to 202.369, inclusive [:] ,
and section 4 of this act:
1. “Antique firearm” has the meaning ascribed to it in 18
U.S.C. § 921(a)(16).
2. “Explosive or incendiary device” means any explosive or
incendiary material or substance that has been constructed, altered,
-
*SB457_R1*

– 20 –
packaged or arranged in such a manner that its ordinary use would
cause destruction or injury to life or property.
3. “Firearm” means any device designed to be used as a
weapon from which a projectile may be expelled through the barrel
by the force of any explosion or other form of combustion.
4. “Firearm capable of being concealed upon the person”
applies to and includes all firearms having a barrel less than 12
inches in length.
5. “Firearms importer or manufacturer” means a person
licensed to import or manufacture firearms pursuant to 18 U.S.C.
Chapter 44.
6. “Machine gun” means any weapon which shoots, is
designed to shoot or can be readily restored to shoot more than one
shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger.
7. “Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled.
8. “Semiautomatic firearm” means any firearm that:
(a) Uses a portion of the energy of a firing cartridge to extract
the fired cartridge case and chamber the next shell or round;
(b) Requires a separate function of the trigger to fire each
cartridge; and
(c) Is not a machine gun.
9. “Unfinished frame or receiver” means a blank, a casting or a
machined body that is intended to be turned into the frame or lower
receiver of a firearm with additional machining and which has been
formed or machined to the point at which most of the major
machining operations have been completed to turn the blank, casting
or machined body into a frame or lower receiver of a firearm even if
the fire-control cavity area of the blank, casting or machined body is
still completely solid and unmachined.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB457_R1*

– 21 –
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 26. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 28. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 29. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 29.1. Chapter 205 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a person intentionally causes property damage to a retail
establishment during the commission of a theft offense and the
aggregate value of the amount involved in the theft or property
damage, or any combination thereof, is $500 or more, the person
is guilty of a category C felony and shall be punished as provided
in NRS 193.130.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Retail establishment” means an establishment that sells
goods or merchandise from a fixed location for direct
consumption by a purchaser. The term includes, without
limitation, an establishment that prepares and sells meals or other
edible products, regardless of the place of consumption by the
consumer.
(b) “Theft offense” means a violation of NRS 205.0832 or
205.240, as applicable.
Sec. 29.3. Chapter 4 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 29.5 and 29.7 of this act.
Sec. 29.5. 1. In a county wherein the board of county
commissioners adopts an ordinance that designates the
geographic boundaries of one or more corridors pursuant to
section 65.5 of this act, a justice court may establish an
appropriate program for the adjudication of offenses punishable
as a misdemeanor that occurred within such corridors.
2. Under a program established pursuant to subsection 1, a
justice court may rescind an order prohibiting a person from
entering a corridor upon the successful completion by the person
of a diversion program for which participation is a condition of
release, sentencing, suspended sentence or deferred adjudication.
Sec. 29.7. 1. On or before July 1 of each year, a justice
court that has established a program for the adjudication of
offenses pursuant to section 29.5 of this act shall prepare and
submit an annual report to the Legislature.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the report
prepared and submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
-
*SB457_R1*

– 22 –
(a) The number of persons charged, convicted and sentenced
for any offense punishable as a misdemeanor in the corridor
during the immediately preceding year;
(b) The underlying crime for which such persons were
charged, convicted and sentenced in the corridor during the
immediately preceding year;
(c) The rate of successful completion of the sentence or
condition of release, which must be expressed as the percentage of
persons who successfully completed the sentence or condition of
release imposed by the court out of the total number of persons
sentenced by the court;
(d) The number of persons subject to an order prohibiting a
person from entering the geographic boundaries of a corridor
designated by ordinance in the immediately preceding year,
including, without limitation, whether the person has been
charged or convicted of a repeat offense within a corridor; and
(e) The information described in paragraphs (a) to (d),
inclusive, pertaining to any person who has been ordered,
assigned or sentenced to a diversion program.
3. Not later than the last day of each calendar month, a
justice court that has established a program for adjudication
pursuant to section 29.5 of this act shall prepare and submit a
monthly report to the board of county commissioners.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the report
prepared and submitted pursuant to subsection 3 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Any information required to be submitted to the
Legislature pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) The total number of cases involving offenses punishable as
a misdemeanor that were committed within a corridor;
(c) For each case reported pursuant to paragraph (b):
(1) The name of the presiding justice of the peace;
(2) The case number or other case identifier used by the
justice court for each case;
(3) Whether the person is a repeat offender for an offense
committed within the corridor; and
(4) If the person is a repeat offender for an offense
committed within a corridor:
(I) The duration of the time that has passed between the
commission of the offenses;
(II) The conditions of the sentences for the offenses;
and
(III) Whether the defendant was incarcerated for the
offenses.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 23 –
5. Any report submitted pursuant to this section must not
include any identifying information of the:
(a) Person who was the subject of an order prohibiting the
person from entering a corridor; or
(b) Business or location where the underlying offense
occurred.
Sec. 30. Chapter 33 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a court orders an adverse party to surrender, sell or
transfer any firearm pursuant to NRS 33.031, the court shall
require the adverse party to appear for a compliance hearing to
determine whether the adverse party has complied with the
provisions of the order for the surrender, sale or transfer of the
firearm.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the court
shall schedule the compliance hearing not earlier than 2 business
days nor later than 5 business days after the issuance of the order
for the surrender, sale or transfer.
3. If an adverse party is in custody at the time that the
compliance hearing is scheduled pursuant to subsection 2, the
court shall reschedule the compliance hearing to a date that is not
later than 1 business day after the release of the adverse party
from custody.
4. The court may cancel the compliance hearing if:
(a) The person provides the affidavit described in paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 of NRS 33.033;
(b) The adverse party provides the receipt or other
documentation required by subsection 2, 3 or 4 of NRS 33.033, as
applicable; or
(c) The court issues a search warrant pursuant to subsection 5
of NRS 33.033.
Sec. 31. NRS 33.017 is hereby amended to read as follows:
33.017 As used in NRS 33.017 to 33.100, inclusive, and
section 30 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Extended order” means an extended order for protection
against domestic violence.
2. “Temporary order” means a temporary order for protection
against domestic violence.
Sec. 32. NRS 33.018 is hereby amended to read as follows:
33.018 1. Domestic violence occurs when a person commits
one of the following acts against or upon the person’s spouse or
former spouse, any other person to whom the person is related by
blood or marriage, any other person with whom the person has had
or is having a dating relationship, any other person with whom the
person has a child in common, the minor child of any of those
-
*SB457_R1*

– 24 –
persons, the person’s minor child or any other person who has been
appointed the custodian or legal guardian for the person’s minor
child:
(a) A battery.
(b) An assault.
(c) Coercion pursuant to NRS 207.190.
(d) A sexual assault.
(e) A knowing, purposeful or reckless course of conduct
intended to harass the other person. Such conduct may include, but
is not limited to:
(1) Stalking.
(2) Arson.
(3) Trespassing.
(4) Larceny.
(5) Destruction of private property.
(6) Carrying a concealed weapon without a permit.
(7) Injuring or killing an animal.
(8) Burglary.
(9) An invasion of the home.
(f) A false imprisonment.
(g) Pandering.
(h) A kidnapping.
(i) An attempt or solicitation to commit an offense described in
paragraphs (a) to (h), inclusive.
2. The provisions of this section do not apply to:
(a) Siblings, except those siblings who are in a custodial or
guardianship relationship with each other; or
(b) Cousins, except those cousins who are in a custodial or
guardianship relationship with each other.
3. As used in this section, “dating relationship” means
frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the
expectation of affectional or sexual involvement. The term does not
include a casual relationship or an ordinary association between
persons in a business or social context.
Sec. 33. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34.3. NRS 41.910 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.910 1. If a court finds that a person is entitled to a
judgment pursuant to NRS 41.900, the court shall enter a certificate
of innocence finding that the person was innocent of the felony for
which the person was wrongfully convicted.
2. If a court does not find that a person is entitled to a judgment
pursuant to NRS 41.900, the action must be dismissed and the court
shall not enter a certificate of innocence.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 25 –
3. Upon an entry of a certificate of innocence pursuant to
subsection 1, the court shall order sealed all records of the
conviction, except such records maintained by the parties
concerning a civil action for wrongful conviction brought pursuant
to NRS 41.900, which are in the custody of any agency of criminal
justice or any public or private agency, company, official or other
custodian of records in the State of Nevada and shall order all such
records of the person returned to the file of the court where the
underlying criminal action was commenced from, including, without
limitation, the Federal Bureau of Investigation and all other agencies
of criminal justice which maintain such records and which are
reasonably known by either the person or the court to have
possession of such records. Such records must be sealed regardless
of whether the person has any prior criminal convictions in this
State.
4. The records maintained by the parties concerning a civil
action for wrongful conviction pursuant to subsection 3 must remain
confidential.
5. The entry of a certificate of innocence pursuant to
subsection 1 and the provision of an award pursuant to NRS
41.950 shall not be construed to be a finding that:
(a) A person involved in the investigation, prosecution or
conviction of the underlying offense committed any wrongdoing;
or
(b) There was not probable cause to arrest or file a complaint
against the person subject to the certificate of innocence.
Sec. 34.7. NRS 62A.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62A.060 [1.] “Community service” means [community
service] a community-based activity that:
1. Facilitates civic engagement or enhances connections
between the child and his or her community, provides training in
life skills or increases the employability of the child through basic
job training;
2. Is designed to:
(a) Encourage the development of empathy for victims of
crime;
(b) Repair harm done to victims and the community by giving
back to victims and the community;
(c) Facilitate the development of critical thinking and problem
solving skills;
(d) Facilitate the development of a deeper understanding of
community problems;
(e) Provide the child with a better understanding of how to
make constructive changes;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 26 –
(f) Assist the child with gaining a sense of individual
effectiveness;
(g) Facilitate the development in the child of a personal stake
in the well-being of the community; or
(h) Provide the child with a better understanding of the need
for involvement in the community in a way that affects positive
change; and
3. Is performed in accordance with NRS 62E.190.
[2. The term includes, but is not limited to, public service,
work on public projects, supervised work for the benefit of the
community or any other work required by the juvenile court.]
Sec. 35. Chapter 62C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A child must not be released before a detention hearing is
held pursuant to NRS 62C.040 if the child:
(a) Is taken into custody for an unlawful act in violation of
NRS 200.481 against a school employee or child welfare
professional; and
(b) Has, in the previous year, been taken two or more times
into custody for an unlawful act in violation of paragraph (d) of
subsection 2 of NRS 200.481 for which:
(1) The child has been placed on informal supervision
pursuant to NRS 62C.200; or
(2) A petition has been filed alleging that the child is
delinquent.
2. At the detention hearing, the juvenile court shall order the
mental health of the child to be evaluated by a qualified
professional, if the child has not been ordered by the court to be so
evaluated in the previous year.
3. If an evaluation is required by subsection 2, the court
shall:
(a) Detain the child at a facility for the detention of children
for not more than 14 days or until the completion of the
evaluation, whichever is sooner; or
(b) Place the child under a program of supervision in the
home of the child that may include electronic surveillance of the
child.
4. If a child is evaluated by a qualified professional pursuant
to subsection 2, the statements made by the child to the qualified
professional during the evaluation and any evidence directly or
indirectly derived from those statements may not be used for any
purpose in a proceeding which is conducted to prove that the child
committed a delinquent act or criminal offense. The provisions of
this subsection do not prohibit the district attorney from proving
that the child committed a delinquent act or criminal offense
-
*SB457_R1*

– 27 –
based upon evidence obtained from sources or by means that are
independent of the statements made by the child to the qualified
professional during the evaluation.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare professional” means an employee of this
State or a political subdivision of this State who as part of his or
her job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
(c) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(d) “School employee” means any licensed or unlicensed
person employed by a board of trustees of a school district
pursuant to NRS 391.100 or 391.281.
Sec. 36. NRS 62C.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62C.100 1. When a complaint is made alleging that a child is
delinquent or in need of supervision:
(a) The complaint must be referred to a probation officer of the
appropriate county; and
(b) The probation officer shall conduct a preliminary inquiry to
determine whether the best interests of the child or of the public:
(1) Require that a petition be filed; or
(2) Would better be served by placing the child under
informal supervision pursuant to NRS 62C.200.
2. If, after conducting the preliminary inquiry, the probation
officer recommends the filing of a petition, the district attorney shall
determine whether to file the petition.
3. If, after conducting the preliminary inquiry, the probation
officer does not recommend the filing of a petition or that the child
be placed under informal supervision, the probation officer must
notify the complainant regarding the complainant’s right to seek a
review of the complaint by the district attorney.
4. If the complainant seeks a review of the complaint by the
district attorney, the district attorney shall:
(a) Review the facts presented by the complainant;
(b) Consult with the probation officer; and
(c) File the petition with the juvenile court if the district attorney
believes that the filing of the petition is necessary to protect the
interests of the child or of the public.
5. The determination of the district attorney concerning
whether to file the petition is final.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 28 –
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 62C.060 [,] and
section 35 of this act, if a child is in detention or shelter care, the
child must be released immediately if a petition alleging that the
child is delinquent or in need of supervision is not:
(a) Approved by the district attorney; or
(b) Filed within 4 days after the date the complaint was referred
to the probation officer, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays,
except that the juvenile court may, for good cause shown by the
district attorney, allow an additional 4 days for the filing of the
petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays.
Sec. 37. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 38. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39.2. NRS 62E.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.430 1. [If] Except as otherwise provided in this section,
if a child is adjudicated to be in need of supervision because the
child is a habitual truant, the juvenile court shall:
(a) The first time the child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child is a habitual truant:
(1) Order:
(I) The child to pay a fine of not more than $100 or, if the
parent or guardian of the child knowingly induced the child to be a
habitual truant, order the parent or guardian to pay the fine; or
(II) The child to perform not less than 8 hours but not
more than 16 hours of community service; and
(2) If the child is 14 years of age or older, order the
suspension of the driver’s license of the child for at least 30 days but
not more than 6 months. If the child does not possess a driver’s
license, the juvenile court shall prohibit the child from applying for
a driver’s license for 30 days:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order if the child
is eligible to apply for a driver’s license; or
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for
a driver’s license if the child is not eligible to apply for a driver’s
license.
(b) The second or any subsequent time the child is adjudicated
to be in need of supervision because the child is a habitual truant:
(1) Order:
(I) The child to pay a fine of not more than $200 or, if the
parent or guardian of the child knowingly induced the child to be a
habitual truant, order the parent or guardian to pay the fine;
(II) The child to perform not more than 10 hours of
community service; or
(III) Compliance with the requirements set forth in both
sub-subparagraphs (I) and (II); and
-
*SB457_R1*

– 29 –
(2) If the child is 14 years of age or older, order the
suspension of the driver’s license of the child for at least 60 days but
not more than 1 year. If the child does not possess a driver’s license,
the juvenile court shall prohibit the child from applying for a
driver’s license for 60 days:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order if the child
is eligible to apply for a driver’s license; or
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for
a driver’s license if the child is not eligible to apply for a driver’s
license.
2. The juvenile court may suspend the payment of a fine
ordered pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 if the child attends
school for 60 consecutive school days, or its equivalent in a school
district operating under an alternative schedule authorized pursuant
to NRS 388.090, after the imposition of the fine, or has a valid
excuse acceptable to the child’s teacher or the principal for any
absence from school within that period.
3. The juvenile court may suspend the payment of a fine
ordered pursuant to this section if the parent or guardian of a child is
ordered to pay a fine by another court of competent jurisdiction in a
case relating to or arising out of the same circumstances that caused
the juvenile court to adjudicate the child in need of supervision.
4. The community service ordered pursuant to this section must
be performed at the child’s school of attendance, if practicable.
5. If the juvenile court finds that the suspension of the
driver’s license of a child pursuant to this section is not in the best
interest of the child, the juvenile court may order the Department
of Motor Vehicles to issue the child a restricted driver’s license
pursuant to NRS 483.490.
6. If the juvenile court issues an order requiring the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license
to a child pursuant to subsection 5, not later than 5 days after
issuing the order, the juvenile court shall forward to the
Department of Motor Vehicles a copy of the order.
Sec. 39.4. NRS 62E.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.440 1. [If] Except as otherwise provided in this section,
if a child is adjudicated to be in need of supervision because the
child has committed an offense related to tobacco, the juvenile court
may:
(a) The first time the child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child has committed an offense related to
tobacco, order the child to:
(1) Pay a fine of $25; and
(2) Attend and complete a tobacco awareness and cessation
program.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 30 –
(b) The second time the child is adjudicated to be in need of
supervision because the child has committed an offense related to
tobacco, order the child to:
(1) Pay a fine of $50; and
(2) Attend and complete a tobacco awareness and cessation
program.
(c) The third or any subsequent time the child is adjudicated to
be in need of supervision because the child has committed an
offense related to tobacco, order:
(1) The child to pay a fine of $75;
(2) The child to attend and complete a tobacco awareness
and cessation program; and
(3) That the driver’s license of the child be suspended for at
least 30 days but not more than 90 days or, if the child does not
possess a driver’s license, prohibit the child from receiving a
driver’s license for at least 30 days but not more than 90 days:
(I) Immediately following the date of the order, if the
child is eligible to receive a driver’s license.
(II) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for
a driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on
the date of the order.
2. If the juvenile court orders a child to pay a fine pursuant to
this section and the child willfully fails to pay the fine, the juvenile
court may order that the driver’s license of the child be suspended
for at least 30 days but not more than 90 days or, if the child does
not possess a driver’s license, prohibit the child from receiving a
driver’s license for at least 30 days but not more than 90 days:
(a) Immediately following the date of the order, if the child is
eligible to receive a driver’s license.
(b) After the date the child becomes eligible to apply for a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a license on the
date of the order.
 If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending or
delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the juvenile
court shall order the additional suspension or delay, as appropriate,
to apply consecutively with the previous order.
3. If the juvenile court [suspends] finds that the suspension of
the driver’s license of [a] the child pursuant to this section [,] is not
in the best interest of the child, the juvenile court may order the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue the child a restricted driver’s
license pursuant to NRS 483.490 . [permitting the child to drive a
motor vehicle:
(a) To and from work or in the course of his or her work, or
both;
(b) To and from school; or
-
*SB457_R1*

– 31 –
(c) To acquire supplies of medicine or food or receive regularly
scheduled medical care for himself, herself or a member of his or
her immediate family.]
4. If the juvenile court issues an order requiring the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license
to a child pursuant to subsection 3, not later than 5 days after
issuing the order, the juvenile court shall forward to the
Department of Motor Vehicles a copy of the order.
Sec. 39.6. NRS 62E.630 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.630 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a
child is adjudicated delinquent for the unlawful act of using,
possessing, selling or distributing a controlled substance, or
purchasing, consuming or possessing an alcoholic beverage in
violation of NRS 202.020, the juvenile court shall:
(a) If the child possesses a driver’s license, issue an order
suspending the driver’s license of the child for at least 90 days but
not more than 2 years; or
(b) If the child does not possess a driver’s license and the child
is or will be eligible to receive a driver’s license within the 2 years
immediately following the date of the order, issue an order
prohibiting the child from receiving a driver’s license for a period
specified by the juvenile court which must be at least 90 days but
not more than 2 years:
(1) Immediately following the date of the order, if the child
is eligible to receive a driver’s license; or
(2) After the date the child will be eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a driver’s
license on the date of the order.
2. If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending
or delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the
juvenile court shall order the additional suspension or delay, as
appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
3. If the juvenile court finds that [a] the suspension [or delay in
the issuance] of the driver’s license of a child pursuant to this
section [would cause or is causing a severe or undue hardship to] is
not in the best interest of the child , [or his or her immediate family
and that the child is otherwise eligible to receive a driver’s license,]
the juvenile court may order the Department of Motor Vehicles to
issue the child a restricted driver’s license [to the child] pursuant to
NRS 483.490.
4. If the juvenile court issues an order requiring the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license
to a child pursuant to subsection 3, not later than 5 days after issuing
the order, the juvenile court shall forward to the Department of
Motor Vehicles a copy of the order.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 32 –
Sec. 39.8. NRS 62E.690 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62E.690 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a
child is adjudicated delinquent for the unlawful act of placing
graffiti on or otherwise defacing public or private property owned or
possessed by another person in violation of NRS 206.125 or
206.330 or for the unlawful act of carrying a graffiti implement in
certain places without valid authorization in violation of NRS
206.335, the juvenile court shall:
(a) If the child possesses a driver’s license, issue an order
suspending the driver’s license of the child for at least 1 year but not
more than 2 years; or
(b) If the child does not possess a driver’s license and the child
is or will be eligible to receive a driver’s license within the 2 years
immediately following the date of the order, issue an order
prohibiting the child from receiving a driver’s license for a period
specified by the juvenile court which must be at least 1 year but not
more than 2 years:
(1) Immediately following the date of the order, if the child
is eligible to receive a driver’s license; or
(2) After the date the child will be eligible to receive a
driver’s license, if the child is not eligible to receive a driver’s
license on the date of the order.
2. If the child is already the subject of a court order suspending
or delaying the issuance of the driver’s license of the child, the
juvenile court shall order the additional suspension or delay, as
appropriate, to apply consecutively with the previous order.
3. If the juvenile court finds that the suspension of the
driver’s license of a child pursuant to this section is not in the best
interest of the child, the juvenile court may order the Department
of Motor Vehicles to issue the child a restricted driver’s license
pursuant to NRS 483.490.
4. If the juvenile court issues an order requiring the
Department of Motor Vehicles to issue a restricted driver’s license
to a child pursuant to subsection 3, not later than 5 days after
issuing the order, the juvenile court shall forward to the
Department of Motor Vehicles a copy of the order.
Sec. 40. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 41. NRS 176.0931 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.0931 1. If a defendant is convicted of a sexual offense,
the court shall include in sentencing, in addition to any other
penalties provided by law, a special sentence of lifetime supervision.
2. The special sentence of lifetime supervision commences
after any period of probation or any term of imprisonment and any
period of release on parole.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 33 –
3. A person sentenced to lifetime supervision may petition the
sentencing court or the State Board of Parole Commissioners for
release from lifetime supervision. The sentencing court or the Board
shall grant a petition for release from a special sentence of lifetime
supervision if:
(a) The person has complied with the requirements of the
provisions of NRS 179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive;
(b) The person has not been convicted of an offense that poses a
threat to the safety or well-being of others for an interval of at least
10 consecutive years after the person’s last conviction or release
from incarceration, whichever occurs later; and
(c) The person is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of
others, as determined by a licensed, clinical professional who has
received training in the treatment of sexual offenders, if released
from lifetime supervision.
4. A person who is released from lifetime supervision pursuant
to the provisions of subsection 3 remains subject to the provisions
for registration as a sex offender and to the provisions for
community notification, unless the person is otherwise relieved from
the operation of those provisions pursuant to the provisions of NRS
179D.010 to 179D.550, inclusive.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Offense that poses a threat to the safety or well-being of
others” includes, without limitation:
(1) An offense that involves:
(I) A victim less than 18 years of age;
(II) A crime against a child as defined in
NRS 179D.0357;
(III) A sexual offense as defined in NRS 179D.097;
(IV) A deadly weapon, explosives or a firearm;
(V) The use or threatened use of force or violence;
(VI) Physical or mental abuse;
(VII) Death or bodily injury;
(VIII) An act of domestic violence;
(IX) Harassment, stalking, threats of any kind or other
similar acts;
(X) The forcible or unlawful entry of a home, building,
structure, vehicle or other real or personal property; or
(XI) The infliction or threatened infliction of damage or
injury, in whole or in part, to real or personal property.
(2) Any offense listed in subparagraph (1) that is committed
in this State or another jurisdiction, including, without limitation, an
offense prosecuted in:
(I) A tribal court.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 34 –
(II) A court of the United States or the Armed Forces of
the United States.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) A violation of NRS 200.366, subsection 4 of NRS
200.400, NRS 200.710, 200.720, paragraph (b) of subsection [2] 1
of NRS 200.730, paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.975,
NRS 201.180, 201.230, 201.450, 201.540 or 201.550 or paragraph
(a) or (b) of subsection 4 or paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 5 of
NRS 201.560;
(2) An attempt to commit an offense listed in subparagraph
(1); or
(3) An act of murder in the first or second degree,
kidnapping in the first or second degree, false imprisonment,
burglary or invasion of the home if the act is determined to be
sexually motivated at a hearing conducted pursuant to NRS 175.547.
Sec. 42. NRS 176.211 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.211 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
upon a plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere, but
before a judgment of guilt, the court may, without entering a
judgment of guilt and with the consent of the defendant, defer
judgment on the case to a specified future date and set forth specific
terms and conditions for the defendant. The duration of the deferral
period must not exceed the applicable period set forth in subsection
1 of NRS 176A.500 or the extension of the period pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 176A.500. The court may not defer judgment
pursuant to this subsection if the defendant has entered into a plea
agreement with a prosecuting attorney unless the plea agreement
allows the deferral.
2. The terms and conditions set forth for the defendant during
the deferral period may include, without limitation, the:
(a) Payment of restitution;
(b) Payment of court costs;
(c) Payment of an assessment in lieu of any fine authorized by
law for the offense;
(d) Payment of any other assessment or cost authorized by law;
(e) Completion of a term of community service;
(f) Placement on probation pursuant to NRS 176A.500 and the
ordering of any conditions which can be imposed for probation
pursuant to NRS 176A.400; or
(g) Completion of a specialty court program.
3. The court:
(a) Upon the consent of the defendant:
(1) Shall defer judgment for any defendant who has entered a
plea of guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a
violation of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 453.336; or
-
*SB457_R1*

– 35 –
(2) May defer judgment for any defendant who is placed in a
specialty court program. The court may extend any deferral period
for not more than 12 months to allow for the completion of a
specialty court program.
(b) Shall not defer judgment for any defendant who has been
convicted of [a] :
(1) A violent or sexual offense as defined in NRS 202.876
[, a] ;
(2) A crime against a child as defined in NRS 179D.0357
[, a] ;
(3) A violation of NRS 200.508 ; or [a]
(4) A violation of NRS 574.100 that is punishable pursuant to
subsection 6 of that section.
4. Upon violation of a term or condition:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b):
(1) The court may enter a judgment of conviction and
proceed as provided in the section pursuant to which the defendant
was charged.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (e) of
subsection 2 of NRS 193.130, the court may order the defendant to
the custody of the Department of Corrections if the offense is
punishable by imprisonment in the state prison.
(b) If the defendant has been placed in the program for a first or
second violation of paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 453.336,
the court may allow the defendant to continue to participate in the
program or terminate the participation of the defendant in the
program. If the court terminates the participation of the defendant in
the program, the court shall allow the defendant to withdraw his or
her plea.
5. Upon completion of the terms and conditions of the deferred
judgment, and upon a finding by the court that the terms and
conditions have been met, the court shall discharge the defendant
and dismiss the proceedings. Discharge and dismissal pursuant to
this section is without adjudication of guilt and is not a conviction
for purposes of employment, civil rights or any statute or regulation
or license or questionnaire or for any other public or private
purpose, but is a conviction for the purpose of additional penalties
imposed for second or subsequent convictions or the setting of bail.
Discharge and dismissal restores the defendant, in the contemplation
of the law, to the status occupied before the arrest, indictment or
information.
6. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, the
court shall order sealed all documents, papers and exhibits in the
defendant’s record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and
other documents relating to the case in the custody of such other
-
*SB457_R1*

– 36 –
agencies and officers as are named in the court’s order if the
defendant fulfills the terms and conditions imposed by the court and
the Division. The court shall order those records sealed without a
hearing unless the Division or the prosecutor petitions the court, for
good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a hearing
thereon.
7. The provisions of subsection 6 do not apply to, and the
court may not order sealed pursuant to subsection 6, the records of
a defendant who is charged with a violation of NRS 200.508 or
200.5099 and who is discharged pursuant to this section.
8. If the court orders sealed the record of a defendant
discharged pursuant to this section, the court shall send a copy of the
order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the court in writing of its compliance
with the order.
[8.] 9. As used in this section:
(a) “Court” means a district court of the State of Nevada.
(b) “Specialty court program” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 176A.065.
Sec. 43. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 44. NRS 176A.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.245 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2,]
this section, after a defendant is discharged from probation or a case
is dismissed pursuant to NRS 176A.240, the court shall order sealed
all documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order if the defendant fulfills the terms and
conditions imposed by the court and the Division. The court shall
order those records sealed without a hearing unless the Division
petitions the court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and
requests a hearing thereon.
2. If the defendant is charged with a violation of NRS 200.485,
484C.110 or 484C.120 and the charges are conditionally dismissed
or the judgment of conviction is set aside as provided in NRS
176A.240, not sooner than 7 years after the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside
and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant, the justice court,
municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order that all
documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order be sealed. The justice court, municipal
court or district court, as applicable, shall order those records sealed
-
*SB457_R1*

– 37 –
without a hearing unless the Division petitions the court, for good
cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a hearing thereon.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to, and the
court may not order sealed pursuant to this section, the records of
a defendant who is charged with a violation of NRS 200.508 or
200.5099 and who is discharged from probation, whose case is
dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was set aside pursuant
to NRS 176A.240.
4. If the court orders sealed the record of a defendant who is
discharged from probation, whose case is dismissed, whose charges
were conditionally dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was
set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.240, the court shall send a copy of
the order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the court in writing of its compliance
with the order.
Sec. 45. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 46. NRS 176A.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.265 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2,]
this section, after a defendant is discharged from probation or a case
is dismissed pursuant to NRS 176A.260, the district court, justice
court or municipal court, as applicable, shall order sealed all
documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order if the defendant fulfills the terms and
conditions imposed by the court and the Division. The district court,
justice court or municipal court, as applicable, shall order those
records sealed without a hearing unless the Division petitions the
court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a
hearing thereon.
2. If the defendant is charged with a violation of NRS 200.485,
484C.110 or 484C.120 and the charges are conditionally dismissed
or the judgment of conviction is set aside as provided in NRS
176A.260, not sooner than 7 years after the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside
and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant, the justice court,
municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order that all
documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order be sealed. The justice court, municipal
court or district court, as applicable, shall order those records sealed
without a hearing unless the Division petitions the court, for good
cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a hearing thereon.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 38 –
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to, and the
court may not order sealed pursuant to this section, the records of
a defendant who is charged with a violation of NRS 200.508 or
200.5099 and who is discharged from probation, whose case is
dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was set aside pursuant
to NRS 176A.260.
4. If the district court, justice court or municipal court, as
applicable, orders sealed the record of a defendant who is
discharged from probation, whose case is dismissed, whose charges
were conditionally dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was
set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.260, the court shall send a copy of
the order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the district court, justice court or
municipal court, as applicable, in writing of its compliance with the
order.
Sec. 47. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 48. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 49. NRS 176A.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.295 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2,]
this section, after a defendant is discharged from probation or a case
is dismissed pursuant to NRS 176A.290, the justice court, municipal
court or district court, as applicable, shall order sealed all
documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order if the defendant fulfills the terms and
conditions imposed by the court and the Division. The justice court,
municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order those
records sealed without a hearing unless the Division petitions the
court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a
hearing thereon.
2. If the defendant is charged with a violation of NRS 200.485,
484C.110 or 484C.120 and the charges are conditionally dismissed
or the judgment of conviction is set aside as provided in NRS
176A.290, not sooner than 7 years after the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside
and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant, the justice court,
municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order that all
documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order be sealed. The justice court, municipal
court or district court, as applicable, shall order those records sealed
without a hearing unless the Division petitions the court, for good
cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a hearing thereon.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 39 –
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to, and the
court may not order sealed pursuant to this section, the records of
a defendant who is charged with a violation of NRS 200.508 or
200.5099 and who is discharged from probation, whose case is
dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was set aside pursuant
to NRS 176A.290.
4. If the justice court, municipal court or district court, as
applicable, orders sealed the record of a defendant who is
discharged from probation, whose case is dismissed, whose charges
were conditionally dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was
set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.290, the court shall send a copy of
the order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the justice court, municipal court or
district court, as applicable, in writing of its compliance with the
order.
Sec. 50. NRS 176A.413 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.413 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
a defendant is convicted of stalking [with the use of an Internet or
network site, electronic mail, text messaging or any other similar
means of communication] by electronic means pursuant to
[subsection 4 of] NRS 200.575, an offense involving pornography
and a minor pursuant to NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive, luring a
child or a person with mental illness through the use of a computer,
system or network pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 4
of NRS 201.560 or a violation of NRS 201.553 which involved the
use of an electronic communication device and the court grants
probation or suspends the sentence, the court shall, in addition to
any other condition ordered pursuant to NRS 176A.400, order as a
condition of probation or suspension that the defendant not own or
use a computer, including, without limitation, use electronic mail, a
chat room or the Internet.
2. The court is not required to impose a condition of probation
or suspension of sentence set forth in subsection 1 if the court finds
that:
(a) The use of a computer by the defendant will assist a law
enforcement agency or officer in a criminal investigation;
(b) The defendant will use the computer to provide
technological training concerning technology of which the
defendant has a unique knowledge; or
(c) The use of the computer by the defendant will assist
companies that require the use of the specific technological
knowledge of the defendant that is unique and is otherwise
unavailable to the company.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, if a defendant
is convicted of an offense that involved the use of a computer,
-
*SB457_R1*

– 40 –
system or network and the court grants probation or suspends the
sentence, the court may, in addition to any other condition ordered
pursuant to NRS 176A.400, order as a condition of probation or
suspension that the defendant not own or use a computer, including,
without limitation, use electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4735
and includes, without limitation, an electronic communication
device.
(b) “Electronic communication device” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.737.
(c) “Electronic means” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.575.
(d) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4745.
[(d)] (e) “System” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.476.
[(e) “Text messaging” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.575.]
Sec. 51. Chapter 178 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If a court prohibits a person from possessing a firearm as a
condition of release pursuant to NRS 178.4851, the court shall
require the person to appear for a compliance hearing to
determine whether the person has complied with the prohibition.
2. The court shall schedule the compliance hearing not
earlier than 2 business days nor later than 5 business days after
the release of the person.
3. For the purpose of complying with a condition of release
prohibiting the person from possessing a firearm, the person and
the court may follow the procedures for:
(a) The surrender, sale or transfer of firearms described in
NRS 202.361; and
(b) The cancellation of a compliance hearing described in
section 4 of this act.
Sec. 52. NRS 178.483 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.483 As used in NRS 178.483 to 178.548, inclusive, and
section 51 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
“electronic transmission,” “electronically transmit” or
“electronically transmitted” means any form or process of
communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper
or another tangible medium which:
1. Is suitable for the retention, retrieval and reproduction of
information by the recipient; and
-
*SB457_R1*

– 41 –
2. Is retrievable and reproducible in paper form by the recipient
through an automated process used in conventional commercial
practice.
Sec. 53. NRS 178.4849 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.4849 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
and NRS 178.484 and 178.4847, a court shall, within 48 hours after
a person has been taken into custody, excluding any day declared to
be a legal holiday pursuant to NRS 236.015, hold a pretrial release
hearing, in open court or by means of remote communication, to
determine the custody status of the person.
2. The court may continue a pretrial release hearing:
(a) At the request of either party or the court and for good cause
shown.
(b) Upon stipulation of the parties. The court shall schedule a
hearing continued pursuant to this paragraph for the date specified
by stipulation.
3. A stipulation made pursuant to subsection 2 may be:
(a) An oral stipulation; or
(b) A written stipulation communicated by mail, by electronic
mail, via the Internet or by other electronic means.
4. The prosecuting attorney, the defendant and the defendant’s
attorney may appear at a pretrial release hearing by means of remote
communication. An appearance by means of remote communication
must be treated in the same manner as an appearance in person.
5. A magistrate who presides over a pretrial release hearing
may do so by means of remote communication.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Magistrate” means a judicial officer who presides over a
pretrial release hearing.
(b) “Remote communication” means communication through
telephone or videoconferencing.
Sec. 54. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 55. NRS 178.522 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.522 1. When the condition of the bond has been satisfied
or the forfeiture thereof has been set aside or remitted, the court
shall exonerate the obligors and release any bail. The court shall
exonerate the obligors and release any bail at the time of sentencing
the defendant [, if the court has not previously done so] unless the
money deposited [by the defendant] as bail must be applied [to
satisfy a judgment] pursuant to NRS 178.528.
2. A surety may be exonerated by a deposit of cash in the
amount of the bond or by a timely surrender of the defendant into
custody.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 42 –
Sec. 56. NRS 178.528 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.528 1. When money has been deposited [,] as bail by a
person other than a surety, if it remains on deposit at the time of [a
judgment for the payment of a fine,] sentencing, the court, or the
clerk under the direction of the court, upon the provision of notice
to and the agreement of the person who deposited the bail, shall
apply the money in satisfaction [thereof,] of any restitution. [and]
2. If a distribution is not made pursuant to subsection 1, or
after satisfying the restitution pursuant to subsection 1 there is a
surplus remaining, as applicable, the court, or the clerk under the
direction of the court, shall apply the money to any fine and costs .
3. If there is any surplus remaining after the distributions are
made pursuant subsections 1 and 2, as applicable, the court, or the
clerk under the direction of the court, shall refund the surplus [, if
any,] to the person who deposited the bail, unless that person has
directed, in writing, that any surplus be refunded to another.
Sec. 57. NRS 178.572 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.572 1. [In] If a witness refuses, on the basis of the
privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or provide other
information that is necessary to the public interest in any
investigation before a grand jury, [or] any preliminary examination
[or] and trial or other evidentiary proceeding in any court of record,
the [court on motion of the State] prosecuting attorney may request
that the court issue an order [that any material witness be released
from all liability to be prosecuted or punished on account of any] of
immunity to compel the witness to testify or provide other
information.
2. If a court issues an order of immunity:
(a) The witness may not refuse to testify or provide other
information on the basis of the privilege against self-
incrimination;
(b) The testimony or other [evidence the witness may be
required to produce.
2.] information compelled under the order, or any information
directly or indirectly derived from the testimony or other
information, may not be used against the person in any criminal
case, except a prosecution for:
(1) Perjury committed in the giving of such testimony;
(2) Giving a false statement; or
(3) Otherwise failing to comply with the order; and
(c) Before the provision of any testimony by the witness,
the court shall advise the witness orally and in writing of the
information described in paragraph (b) and the effect of the
immunity in regards to future prosecutions.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 43 –
3. Any [motion,] request, hearing or order regarding the
immunity of a grand jury witness must not be made public before an
indictment or presentment is issued in the case.
Sec. 58. NRS 178.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.760 Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
1. A district attorney, assistant district attorney [,] or a
designated city attorney may:
(a) If the attorney is a deputy district attorney or other attorney
employed by a district attorney [may:
(a) Be] be deputized to prosecute a person in a county other than
the county by which the attorney is employed for the limited
purpose of serving as the prosecuting attorney in a pretrial release
hearing required by NRS 178.4849. An assistant district attorney,
deputy district attorney or other attorney employed by a district
attorney must receive the approval of the district attorney of the
county in which the attorney is employed before serving as the
prosecuting attorney in a pretrial release hearing in a county other
than the county by which the attorney is employed.
(b) If the attorney is a designated city attorney, be deputized to
prosecute a person in the county which encompasses the city that
employs the city attorney for the limited purpose of serving as the
prosecuting attorney in a pretrial release hearing required by
NRS 178.4849.
(c) Receive a stipend for being available on a weekend or
holiday to serve as the prosecuting attorney in a pretrial release
hearing required by NRS 178.4849 or for serving as the prosecuting
attorney in any such pretrial release hearing conducted on a
weekend or holiday.
2. A public defender and the State Public Defender may,
pursuant to an interlocal agreement, authorize the public defender,
State Public Defender or any other attorney employed by the public
defender or State Public Defender to provide for the representation
of a defendant in a pretrial release hearing required by NRS
178.4849 in any county.
3. A public defender, the State Public Defender or any other
attorney employed by the public defender or State Public Defender
may receive a stipend for being available on a weekend or holiday
to represent a defendant in a pretrial release hearing required by
NRS 178.4849 or for representing a defendant in any such pretrial
release hearing conducted on a weekend [.] or holiday.
4. As used in this section, “designated city attorney” means a
city attorney in a county in this State whose population is less than
100,000.
Sec. 59. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 60. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB457_R1*

– 44 –
Sec. 60.1. Chapter 179 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 60.2 and 60.3 of this act.
Sec. 60.2. “Sexual offense against a child” includes any act
upon a child constituting:
1. Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
2. Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
3. Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
4. Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210;
5. Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
6. Sado-masochistic abuse pursuant to NRS 201.262; or
7. Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.
Sec. 60.3. 1. The interception, listening or recording of a
wire, electronic or oral communication by a peace officer, or a
designated person acting under the direction or request of a peace
officer, is not unlawful if the peace officer or designated person is
intercepting the communication for the sole purpose of
investigating a sexual offense against a child.
2. As used in this section, “designated person” means:
(a) A child, with the consent of the parent or legal guardian of
the child; and
(b) The parent or legal guardian of a child.
Sec. 60.4. NRS 179.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.410 As used in NRS 179.410 to 179.515, inclusive, and
sections 60.2 and 60.3 of this act, except where the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 179.415 to
179.455, inclusive, and section 60.2 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 60.5. NRS 179.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.460 1. The Attorney General or the district attorney of
any county may apply to a Supreme Court justice or to a district
judge in the county where the interception is to take place for an
order authorizing the interception of wire, electronic or oral
communications, and the judge may, in accordance with NRS
179.470 to 179.515, inclusive, grant an order authorizing the
interception of wire, electronic or oral communications by
investigative or law enforcement officers having responsibility for
the investigation of the offense as to which the application is made,
when the interception may provide evidence of the commission of
murder, kidnapping, robbery, extortion, bribery, escape of an
offender in the custody of the Department of Corrections,
destruction of public property by explosives, a sexual offense
against a child, sex trafficking, a violation of NRS 200.463, 200.464
or 200.465, trafficking in persons in violation of NRS 200.467 or
200.468, a violation of NRS 201.553, the commission of any
-
*SB457_R1*

– 45 –
offense which is made a felony by the provisions of chapter 453 or
454 of NRS or a violation of NRS 463.160 or 465.086.
2. A provider of electronic communication service or a public
utility, an officer, employee or agent thereof or another person
associated with the provider of electronic communication service or
public utility who, pursuant to an order issued pursuant to
subsection 1, provides information or otherwise assists an
investigative or law enforcement officer in the interception of a
wire, electronic or oral communication is immune from any liability
relating to any interception made pursuant to the order.
[3. As used in this section, “sexual offense against a child”
includes any act upon a child constituting:
(a) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180;
(b) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230;
(c) Sado-masochistic abuse pursuant to NRS 201.262;
(d) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366;
(e) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368;
(f) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210; or
(g) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant to
NRS 201.560, if punished as a felony.]
Sec. 60.6. Chapter 209 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 60.7 and 60.8 of this act.
Sec. 60.7. “Alternative correctional program” means the
program for reentry of offenders into the community that is
established by the Director pursuant to section 60.8 of this act.
Sec. 60.8. 1. The Director may establish an alternative
correctional program for reentry of offenders into the community
pursuant to this section.
2. If the Director establishes an alternative correctional
program pursuant to this section, the Director may:
(a) Assign offenders whom:
(1) The Director has requested that the Chair of the State
Board of Parole Commissioners assign to the custody of the
Division to participate in a correctional program pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 209.4888; and
(2) The Chair does not assign to the custody of the Division
to participate in a correctional program pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 209.4888; and
(b) Supervise offenders participating in the alternative
correctional program.
Sec. 61. NRS 209.4247 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.4247 1. To the extent that money is available [,] and
subject to subsection 2, the Director shall, with the approval of the
Board, establish a program of treatment for offenders with a
substance use disorder using medication-assisted treatment.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 46 –
2. If the program established pursuant to subsection 1 relates
to opioid use disorder, the Director shall collaborate with the
Department of Health and Human Services to establish the
program.
3. The program established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Provide each eligible offender who participates in the
program with appropriate medication-assisted treatment for the
period in which the offender is incarcerated; and
(b) Require that all decisions regarding the type, dosage or
duration of any medication administered to an eligible offender as
part of his or her medication-assisted treatment be made by a
treating physician and the eligible offender.
[3.] 4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any
offender who the Director has determined has a substance use
disorder for which a medication-assisted treatment exists and who
meets any reasonable conditions imposed by the Director pursuant
to subsection [4] 5 is eligible to participate in the program
established pursuant to subsection 1 and must be offered the
opportunity to participate. If an offender received medication-
assisted treatment immediately preceding his or her incarceration,
the offender is eligible to continue that medication-assisted
treatment as a participant in the program. Participation in the
program must be voluntary.
[4.] 5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Director may impose reasonable conditions for an offender to be
eligible to participate in the program established pursuant to
subsection 1 and to continue his or her participation in the program.
The Director shall not deny an offender the ability to participate in
the program or terminate the participation of an offender in the
program on the basis that:
(a) The results of a screening test administered to the offender
upon the commencement of his or her incarceration or upon the
commencement of his or her participation in the program indicated
the presence of a controlled substance; or
(b) The offender committed an infraction of the rules of the
institution or facility before or during the participation of the
offender in the program.
[5.] 6. An offender who participates in the program established
pursuant to subsection 1 is not subject to discipline on the basis that
the results of a screening test administered to the offender during his
or her participation in the program indicated the presence of a
controlled substance.
[6.] 7. As used in this section:
-
*SB457_R1*

– 47 –
(a) “Medication-assisted treatment” means treatment for a
substance use disorder using medication approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration for that purpose.
(b) “Substance use disorder” means a cluster of cognitive,
behavioral and psychological symptoms indicating that a person
continues using a substance despite significant substance-related
problems.
Sec. 61.3. NRS 209.4871 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
209.4871 As used in NRS 209.4871 to 209.4889, inclusive,
and sections 60.7 and 60.8 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 209.4873 to 209.488,
inclusive, and section 60.7 of this act have the meanings ascribed to
them in those sections.
Sec. 61.7. NRS 209.4889 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
209.4889 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 208.280,
the Director may enter into one or more contracts with one or more
public or private entities to provide any of the following services, as
necessary and appropriate, to offenders or parolees participating in a
correctional program, alternative correctional program or judicial
program:
(a) Transitional housing;
(b) Treatment pertaining to a substance use disorder or mental
health;
(c) Training in life skills;
(d) Vocational rehabilitation and job skills training; and
(e) Any other services required by offenders or parolees who are
participating in a correctional program, alternative correctional
program or judicial program.
2. The Director may consult with the Division before entering
into a contract with a public or private entity pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. The Director shall, as necessary and appropriate, provide
referrals and information regarding:
(a) Any of the services provided pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Access and availability of any appropriate self-help groups;
(c) Social services for families and children; and
(d) Permanent housing.
4. The Director may apply for and accept any gift, donation,
bequest, grant or other source of money to carry out the provisions
of this section. Money received pursuant to this subsection may be
deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Account for
Reentry Programs in the State General Fund created by
NRS 480.810.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 48 –
5. A contract entered into between the Director and a public or
private entity pursuant to subsection 1 must require the entity to:
(a) Provide a budget concerning all services the entity will
provide during the duration of any grant received.
(b) Provide all services required by any grant received.
(c) Provide to the Department for its approval a curriculum for
any program of services the entity will provide.
(d) Provide to the Division, if appropriate, a list of the parolees
who have completed or are currently participating in a program of
services provided by the entity pursuant to any grant received.
(e) Provide to any offender or parolee who completes a program
of services provided by the entity a certificate of completion, and
provide a copy of such a certificate to the Division or the
Department, as appropriate.
(f) To the extent financially practicable and necessary, assess the
risk levels and needs of offenders and parolees by using a validated
assessment tool.
(g) Share with the Director information concerning assessments
of the risk levels and needs of offenders and parolees so the Director
can ensure that adequate assessments are being conducted.
(h) While the entity is providing services pursuant to the
contract, meet annually with the Director, a representative of the
Division, and other entities that have entered into a contract with
the Director pursuant to subsection 1 to discuss, without limitation:
(1) The services provided by the entities, including the
growth and success of the services, any problems with the services
and any potential solutions to such problems;
(2) Issues relating to the reentry of offenders and parolees
into the community and reducing the risk of recidivism; and
(3) Issues relating to offenders and parolees who receive
services from an entity and are subsequently convicted of another
crime.
6. As used in this section, “training in life skills” includes,
without limitation, training in the areas of:
(a) Parenting;
(b) Improving human relationships;
(c) Preventing domestic violence;
(d) Maintaining emotional and physical health;
(e) Preventing alcohol and other substance use disorders;
(f) Preparing for and obtaining employment; and
(g) Budgeting, consumerism and personal finances.
Sec. 62. NRS 211.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
211.400 1. To the extent that money is available, a sheriff,
chief of police or town marshal who is responsible for a county, city
or town jail or detention facility shall establish a program to provide
-
*SB457_R1*

– 49 –
for the treatment of prisoners with a substance use disorder using
medication-assisted treatment.
2. If the program established pursuant to subsection 1 relates
to opioid use disorder, the sheriff, chief of police or town marshal
shall collaborate with the Department of Health and Human
Services to establish the program.
3. The program established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Provide each eligible prisoner who participates in the
program with appropriate medication-assisted treatment for the
period in which the prisoner is incarcerated; and
(b) Require that all decisions regarding the type, dosage or
duration of any medication administered to an eligible prisoner as
part of his or her medication-assisted treatment be made by a
treating physician and the eligible prisoner.
[3.] 4. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any
prisoner who the sheriff, chief of police or town marshal has
determined has a substance use disorder for which a medication-
assisted treatment exists and who meets any reasonable conditions
imposed by the sheriff, chief of police or town marshal pursuant to
subsection [4] 5 is eligible to participate in the program established
pursuant to subsection 1 and must be offered the opportunity to
participate. If a prisoner received medication-assisted treatment
immediately preceding his or her incarceration, the prisoner is
eligible to continue that medication-assisted treatment as a
participant in the program. Participation in the program must be
voluntary.
[4.] 5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
sheriff, chief of police or town marshal may impose reasonable
conditions for a prisoner to be eligible to participate in the program
established pursuant to subsection 1 and to continue his or her
participation in the program. The sheriff, chief of police or town
marshal shall not deny a prisoner the ability to participate in the
program or terminate the participation of a prisoner in the program
on the basis that:
(a) The results of a screening test administered to the prisoner
upon the commencement of his or her incarceration or upon the
commencement of his or her participation in the program indicated
the presence of a controlled substance; or
(b) The prisoner committed an infraction of the rules of the
county, city or town jail or detention facility before or during the
participation of the prisoner in the program.
[5.] 6. A prisoner who participates in the program established
pursuant to subsection 1 is not subject to discipline on the basis that
the results of a screening test administered to the prisoner during his
-
*SB457_R1*

– 50 –
or her participation in the program indicated the presence of a
controlled substance.
[6.] 7. As used in this section, “medication-assisted treatment”
means treatment for a substance use disorder using medication
approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for
that purpose.
Sec. 63. NRS 213.1258 is hereby amended to read as follows:
213.1258 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
the Board releases on parole a prisoner convicted of stalking [with
the use of an Internet or network site, electronic mail, text
messaging or any other similar means of communication] by
electronic means pursuant to [subsection 4 of] NRS 200.575, an
offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant to NRS
200.710 to 200.730, inclusive, luring a child or a person with mental
illness through the use of a computer, system or network pursuant to
paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 4 of NRS 201.560 or a violation
of NRS 201.553 which involved the use of an electronic
communication device, the Board shall, in addition to any other
condition of parole, require as a condition of parole that the parolee
not own or use a computer, including, without limitation, use
electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
2. The Board is not required to impose a condition of parole set
forth in subsection 1 if the Board finds that:
(a) The use of a computer by the parolee will assist a law
enforcement agency or officer in a criminal investigation;
(b) The parolee will use the computer to provide technological
training concerning technology of which the defendant has a unique
knowledge; or
(c) The use of the computer by the parolee will assist companies
that require the use of the specific technological knowledge of the
parolee that is unique and is otherwise unavailable to the company.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1, if the Board
releases on parole a prisoner convicted of an offense that involved
the use of a computer, system or network, the Board may, in
addition to any other condition of parole, require as a condition of
parole that the parolee not own or use a computer, including,
without limitation, use electronic mail, a chat room or the Internet.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4735
and includes, without limitation, an electronic communication
device.
(b) “Electronic communication device” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.737.
(c) “Electronic means” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.575.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 51 –
(d) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 205.4745.
[(d)] (e) “System” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.476.
[(e) “Text messaging” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 200.575.]
Sec. 64. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 65. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 65.5. Chapter 244 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, the
board of county commissioners shall adopt an ordinance that
designates the geographic boundaries of one or more corridors in
which the commission of crime poses a significant risk to public
safety and the economic welfare of this State due to the high
concentration of tourists, visitors, employees and other persons in
such corridors.
2. The boundaries of a corridor established pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) May be contiguous or noncontiguous.
(b) Must be displayed on a map in a manner capable of being
understood by a person of ordinary intelligence and posted on the
Internet website of the county in which the corridor is established.
3. In a county that establishes a corridor pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), a person
who is charged with, convicted of or the subject of deferred
adjudication for any offense punishable as a misdemeanor:
(1) For a first offense within the corridor, may, as a
condition of release, sentencing, suspension of sentence or
deferred adjudication, as applicable, be prohibited from entering
the corridor in which the offense occurred for a period not to
exceed 1 year.
(2) For a second or subsequent offense within the corridor,
may, as a condition of release, sentencing, suspension of sentence
or deferred adjudication, as applicable, be prohibited from
entering the corridor in which the offense occurred for a period of
not less than 1 year but not more than 2 years.
(b) The board of county commissioners may provide by
ordinance for any condition or exemption under which a person
who is charged with, convicted of or the subject of adjudication for
any offense punishable as a misdemeanor may enter the corridor
in which the offense occurred.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 52 –
Sec. 66. Chapter 433 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Department shall make available on an Internet website
maintained by the Department information relating to peer
recovery support services.
Sec. 67. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 68. NRS 433.622 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.622 As used in NRS 433.622 to 433.641, inclusive, and
section 66 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 433.623 to 433.629, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 69. NRS 433.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.730 1. On or before June 30 of each even-numbered
year, the Advisory Committee shall submit to the Director of the
Department a report of recommendations concerning:
(a) The statewide needs assessment conducted pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734, including, without
limitation, the establishment of priorities pursuant to paragraph [(e)]
(f) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.736; and
(b) The statewide plan to allocate money from the Fund
developed pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 433.734.
2. When developing recommendations to be included in the
report pursuant to subsection 1, the Advisory Committee shall
consider:
(a) Health equity and identifying relevant disparities among
racial and ethnic populations, geographic regions and special
populations in this State; and
(b) The need to prevent overdoses, address disparities in access
to health care and prevent substance use among youth.
3. When developing recommendations concerning the
establishment of priorities pursuant to paragraph [(e)] (f) of
subsection 1 of NRS 433.736, the Advisory Committee shall use an
objective method to define the potential positive and negative
impacts of a priority on the health of the affected communities with
an emphasis on disproportionate impacts to any population targeted
by the priority.
4. Before finalizing a report of recommendations pursuant to
subsection 1, the Advisory Committee must hold at least one public
meeting to solicit comments from the public concerning the
recommendations and make any revisions to the recommendations
determined, as a result of the public comment received, to be
necessary.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 53 –
Sec. 70. NRS 433.736 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.736 1. A statewide needs assessment conducted by the
Department, in consultation with the Office, pursuant to paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734 must:
(a) Be evidence-based and use information from damages
reports created by experts as part of the litigation described in
subsection 1 of NRS 433.732.
(b) Include an analysis of the impacts of opioid use and opioid
use disorder on this State that uses quantitative and qualitative data
concerning this State and the regions, counties and Native American
tribes in this State to determine the risk factors that contribute to
opioid use, the use of substances and the rates of opioid use
disorder, other substance use disorders and co-occurring disorders
among residents of this State.
(c) Focus on health equity and identifying disparities across all
racial and ethnic populations, geographic regions and special
populations in this State.
(d) Take into account the resources of state, regional, local and
tribal agencies and nonprofit organizations, including, without
limitation, any money recovered or anticipated to be recovered by
county, local or tribal governmental agencies through judgments or
settlements resulting from litigation concerning the manufacture,
distribution, sale or marketing of opioids, and the programs
currently existing in each geographic region of this State to address
opioid use disorder and other substance use disorders.
(e) Identify educational resources for governmental agencies
involved in law enforcement or criminal justice for training
related to trauma-informed practices for persons with opioid use
disorder and medication-assisted treatment for persons with opioid
use disorder.
(f) Based on the information and analyses described in
paragraphs (a) to [(d),] (e), inclusive, establish priorities for the use
of the funds described in subsection 1 of NRS 433.732. Such
priorities must include, without limitation, priorities related to the
training described in paragraph (e) and prevention of overdoses,
addressing disparities in access to health care and the prevention of
substance use among youth.
2. When conducting a needs assessment, the Department, in
consultation with the Office, shall:
(a) Use community-based participatory research methods or
similar methods to conduct outreach to groups impacted by the use
of opioids, opioid use disorder and other substance use disorders,
including, without limitation:
(1) Persons and families impacted by the use of opioids and
other substances;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 54 –
(2) Providers of treatment for opioid use disorder and other
substance use disorders;
(3) Substance use disorder prevention coalitions;
(4) Communities of persons in recovery from opioid use
disorder and other substance use disorders;
(5) Providers of services to reduce the harms caused by
opioid use disorder and other substance use disorders;
(6) Persons involved in the child welfare system;
(7) Providers of social services;
(8) Faith-based organizations;
(9) Providers of health care and entities that provide health
care services; and
(10) Members of diverse communities disproportionately
impacted by opioid use and opioid use disorder; and
(b) Conduct outreach to governmental agencies who interact
with persons or groups impacted by the use of opioids, opioid use
disorder and other substance use disorders, including, without
limitation:
(1) The Office of the Attorney General, the Department of
Public Safety, the Department of Corrections, courts, juvenile
justice agencies and other governmental agencies involved in law
enforcement or criminal justice;
(2) Agencies which provide child welfare services and other
governmental agencies involved in the child welfare system; and
(3) Public health agencies.
3. As used in this section, “medication-assisted treatment”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 639.28079.
Sec. 71. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 72. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 73. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 74. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 75. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 76. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 76.5. NRS 483.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.490 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, after
a driver’s license has been suspended or revoked and one-half of the
period during which the driver is not eligible for a license has
expired, the Department may, unless the statute authorizing the
suspension or revocation prohibits the issuance of a restricted
license, issue a restricted driver’s license to an applicant permitting
the applicant to drive a motor vehicle:
(a) To and from work or in the course of his or her work, or
both; or
-
*SB457_R1*

– 55 –
(b) To acquire supplies of medicine or food or receive regularly
scheduled medical care for himself, herself or a member of his or
her immediate family.
 Before a restricted license may be issued, the applicant must
submit sufficient documentary evidence to satisfy the Department
that a severe hardship exists because the applicant has no alternative
means of transportation and that the severe hardship outweighs the
risk to the public if the applicant is issued a restricted license.
2. If the driver’s license of a person assigned to a program
established pursuant to NRS 484C.392 is suspended or revoked, the
Department may issue a restricted driver’s license to an applicant
that is valid while he or she is participating in and complying with
the requirements of the program and that permits the applicant to
drive a motor vehicle:
(a) To and from a testing location established by a designated
law enforcement agency pursuant to NRS 484C.393;
(b) If applicable, to and from work or in the course of his or her
work, or both;
(c) To and from court appearances;
(d) To and from counseling; or
(e) To receive regularly scheduled medical care for himself or
herself.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 62E.430, 62E.440,
62E.630 [,] and 62E.690, after a driver’s license has been revoked
or suspended pursuant to title 5 of NRS or NRS 392.148, the
Department may issue a restricted driver’s license to an applicant
permitting the applicant to drive a motor vehicle:
(a) If applicable, to and from work or in the course of his or her
work, or both; or
(b) If applicable, to and from school.
4. After a driver’s license has been suspended pursuant to NRS
483.443, the Department may issue a restricted driver’s license to an
applicant permitting the applicant to drive a motor vehicle:
(a) If applicable, to and from work or in the course of his or her
work, or both;
(b) To receive regularly scheduled medical care for himself,
herself or a member of his or her immediate family; or
(c) If applicable, as necessary to exercise a court-ordered right to
visit a child.
5. A driver who violates a condition of a restricted license
issued pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 is guilty of a misdemeanor and,
if the license of the driver was suspended or revoked for:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.210 or 484C.430;
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
-
*SB457_R1*

– 56 –
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b),
 the driver shall be punished in the manner provided pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 483.560.
6. The periods of suspensions and revocations required
pursuant to this chapter and NRS 484C.210 must run consecutively,
except as otherwise provided in NRS 483.465 and 483.475, when
the suspensions must run concurrently.
7. Whenever the Department suspends or revokes a license, the
period of suspension, or of ineligibility for a license after the
revocation, begins upon the effective date of the revocation or
suspension as contained in the notice thereof.
8. Any person for whom a court provides an exception relating
to the installation of an ignition interlock device pursuant to
subsection 4 of NRS 484C.210 or subsection 2 of NRS 484C.460 is
eligible for a restricted driver’s license under this section while the
person is participating in and complying with the requirements of a
program established pursuant to NRS 484C.392.
9. If the Department receives a copy of an order requiring a
person to install an ignition interlock device in a motor vehicle
pursuant to NRS 484C.460, the Department shall issue an ignition
interlock privilege to the person after he or she submits proof of
compliance with the order. A person who is required to install an
ignition interlock device pursuant to NRS 484C.210 or 484C.460
shall install the device not later than 14 days after the date on which
the order was issued. A driver who violates any condition of an
ignition interlock privilege issued pursuant to this subsection is
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished in the same manner
provided in subsection 2 of NRS 483.560 for driving a vehicle while
a driver’s license is cancelled, revoked or suspended.
Sec. 77. NRS 484C.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.110 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath; or
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway
or on premises to which the public has access.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 57 –
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle,
 to drive or be in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway
or on premises to which the public has access. The fact that any
person charged with a violation of this subsection is or has been
entitled to use that drug under the laws of this State is not a defense
against any charge of violating this subsection.
3. It is unlawful for any person to drive or be in actual physical
control of a vehicle on a highway or on premises to which the public
has access with an amount of any of the following prohibited
substances in his or her blood or urine that is equal to or greater
than:

Urine Blood
Nanograms
Prohibited substance per milliliter per milliliter

(a) Amphetamine 500 100
(b) Cocaine 150 50
(c) Cocaine metabolite 150 50
(d) Heroin 2,000 50
(e) Heroin metabolite:
(1) Morphine 2,000 50
(2) 6-monoacetyl morphine 10 10
(f) Lysergic acid diethylamide 25 10
(g) Methamphetamine 500 100
(h) Phencyclidine 25 10

4. For any violation that is punishable pursuant to paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400, NRS 484C.410, 484C.430 or
484C.440, it is unlawful for any person to drive or be in actual
physical control of a vehicle on a highway or on premises to which
the public has access with an amount of any of the following
prohibited substances in his or her blood that is equal to or greater
than:
-
*SB457_R1*

– 58 –
Blood
Nanograms
Prohibited substance per milliliter

(a) Marijuana (delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol) 2
(b) Marijuana metabolite (11-OH-tetrahydrocannabinol) 5

5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after driving or being in actual physical control of the
vehicle, and before his or her blood or breath was tested, to cause
the defendant to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in
his or her blood or breath. A defendant who intends to offer this
defense at a trial or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days
before the trial or hearing or at such other time as the court may
direct, file and serve on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of
that intent.
6. A person who violates any provision of this section may be
subject to any additional penalty set forth in NRS 484B.130 or
484B.135.
Sec. 78. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 79. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 80. NRS 484C.430 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.430 1. [Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 484C.440, a] A person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath;
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after driving or
being in actual physical control of a vehicle to have a concentration
of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or breath;
(d) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is under
the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(e) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
driving or exercising actual physical control of a vehicle; or
(f) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 484C.110,
 and does any act or neglects any duty imposed by law while
driving or in actual physical control of any vehicle on or off the
highways of this State, if the act or neglect of duty proximately
-
*SB457_R1*

– 59 –
causes the death of, or substantial bodily harm to, another person,
shall be punished as provided in subsection 2.
2. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS
484C.440, a person who violates any provision of subsection 1 is
guilty of :
(a) If the violation proximately causes the death of another
person and the person who committed the violation:
(1) Has not previously been convicted of any offense, a
category B felony and shall be punished by a term of
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 25 years and
must be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor
more than $5,000.
(2) Has previously been convicted of one or two offenses, a
category B felony and shall be punished by a term of
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 5 years and a maximum term of not more than 25 years and
must be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor
more than $5,000.
(b) If the violation proximately causes substantial bodily harm
to another person, a category B felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 20 years and
must be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more
than $5,000.
3. A person [so] imprisoned pursuant to subsection 2 must,
insofar as practicable, be segregated from offenders whose crimes
were violent and, insofar as practicable, be assigned to an institution
or facility of minimum security.
[2.] 4. A prosecuting attorney shall not dismiss a charge of
violating the provisions of subsection 1 in exchange for a plea of
guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or
for any other reason unless the attorney knows or it is obvious that
the charge is not supported by probable cause or cannot be proved at
the time of trial. A sentence imposed pursuant to subsection [1] 2
may not be suspended nor may probation be granted.
[3.] 5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [4,] 6, if
consumption is proven by a preponderance of the evidence, it is an
affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of subsection 1 that the
defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of alcohol after driving or
being in actual physical control of the vehicle, and before his or her
blood or breath was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial
or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial or
-
*SB457_R1*

– 60 –
hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and serve
on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
[4.] 6. If the defendant is also charged with violating the
provisions of NRS 484E.010, 484E.020 or 484E.030, the defendant
may not offer the affirmative defense set forth in subsection [3.] 5.
[5.] 7. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less
than 15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation,
the court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in
determining the sentence of the defendant.
8. As used in this section, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of this section;
(b) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120;
(c) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by this section or NRS 484C.110 or
484C.130; or
(d) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a), (b)
or (c).
Sec. 81. NRS 488.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.410 1. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath; or
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after operating or
being in actual physical control of a power-driven vessel or sailing
vessel under way to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more
in his or her blood or breath,
 to operate or be in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way on the waters of this State.
2. It is unlawful for any person who:
(a) Is under the influence of a controlled substance;
(b) Is under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a
controlled substance; or
(c) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
operating or exercising actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way,
 to operate or be in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way on the waters of this State.
3. It is unlawful for any person to operate or be in actual
physical control of a power-driven vessel or sailing vessel under
way on the waters of this State with an amount of any of the
-
*SB457_R1*

– 61 –
following prohibited substances in his or her blood or urine that is
equal to or greater than:
Urine Blood
Nanograms per Nanograms per
Prohibited substance milliliter milliliter

(a) Amphetamine 500 100
(b) Cocaine 150 50
(c) Cocaine metabolite 150 50
(d) Heroin 2,000 50
(e) Heroin metabolite:
(1) Morphine 2,000 50
(2) 6-monoacetyl morphine 10 10
(f) Lysergic acid diethylamide 25 10
(g) Methamphetamine 500 100
(h) Phencyclidine 25 10

4. For any violation that is punishable pursuant to NRS
488.420, 488.425 or 488.427, it is unlawful for any person to
operate or be in actual physical control of a power-driven vessel or
sailing vessel under way on the waters of this State with an amount
of any of the following prohibited substances in his or her blood that
is equal to or greater than:

Blood
Nanograms per
Prohibited substance milliliter

(a) Marijuana (delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol) 2
(b) Marijuana metabolite (11-OH-tetrahydrocannabinol) 5

5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after operating or being in actual physical control of the
power-driven vessel or sailing vessel, as applicable, under way and
before his or her blood was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of 0.08 or more of alcohol in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial
or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial or
hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and serve
on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 488.427, a person who
violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
-
*SB457_R1*

– 62 –
Sec. 82. NRS 488.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
488.420 1. [Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 488.425, a] A person who:
(a) Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;
(b) Has a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her
blood or breath;
(c) Is found by measurement within 2 hours after operating or
being in actual physical control of a power-driven vessel or sailing
vessel under way to have a concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more
in his or her blood or breath;
(d) Is under the influence of a controlled substance or is under
the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance;
(e) Inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any chemical,
poison or organic solvent, or any compound or combination of any
of these, to a degree which renders the person incapable of safely
operating or being in actual physical control of a power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way; or
(f) Has a prohibited substance in his or her blood or urine, as
applicable, in an amount that is equal to or greater than the amount
set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 488.410,
 and does any act or neglects any duty imposed by law while
operating or being in actual physical control of any power-driven
vessel or sailing vessel under way, if the act or neglect of duty
proximately causes the death of, or substantial bodily harm to,
another person, shall be punished as provided in subsection 2.
2. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to NRS
488.425, a person who violates subsection 1 is guilty of :
(a) If the violation proximately causes the death of another
person and the person who committed the violation:
(1) Has not previously been convicted of any offense, a
category B felony and shall be punished by a term of
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 25 years and
shall be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor
more than $5,000.
(2) Has previously been convicted of one or two offenses, a
category B felony and shall be punished by a term of
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 5 years and a maximum term of not more than 25 years and
shall be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor
more than $5,000.
(b) If the violation proximately causes substantial bodily harm
to another person, a category B felony and shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
-
*SB457_R1*

– 63 –
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 20 years and
shall be further punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more
than $5,000.
3. A person [so] imprisoned pursuant to subsection 2 must,
insofar as practicable, be segregated from offenders whose crimes
were violent and, insofar as practicable, be assigned to an institution
or facility of minimum security.
[2.] 4. A prosecuting attorney shall not dismiss a charge of
violating the provisions of subsection 1 in exchange for a plea of
guilty, guilty but mentally ill or nolo contendere to a lesser charge or
for any other reason unless the prosecuting attorney knows or it is
obvious that the charge is not supported by probable cause or cannot
be proved at the time of trial. A sentence imposed pursuant to
subsection [1] 2 must not be suspended, and probation must not be
granted.
[3.] 5. If consumption is proven by a preponderance of the
evidence, it is an affirmative defense under paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 that the defendant consumed a sufficient quantity of
alcohol after operating or being in actual physical control of the
power-driven vessel or sailing vessel, as applicable, under way and
before his or her blood was tested, to cause the defendant to have a
concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in his or her blood or
breath. A defendant who intends to offer this defense at a trial
or preliminary hearing must, not less than 14 days before the trial or
hearing or at such other time as the court may direct, file and serve
on the prosecuting attorney a written notice of that intent.
[4.] 6. If a person less than 15 years of age was in the vessel at
the time of the defendant’s violation, the court shall consider that
fact as an aggravating factor in determining the sentence of the
defendant.
7. As used in this section, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of this section;
(b) A violation of NRS 488.410;
(c) A homicide resulting from operating or being in actual
physical custody of a power-driven vessel or sailing vessel under
way while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by this section or NRS 488.410 or 488.425; or
(d) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a), (b)
or (c).
Sec. 83. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 84. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 85. NRS 641.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641.029 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
-
*SB457_R1*

– 64 –
1. A physician who is licensed to practice in this State;
2. A person who is licensed to practice dentistry in this State;
3. A person who is licensed as a marriage and family therapist
or marriage and family therapist intern pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
4. A person who is licensed as a clinical professional counselor
or clinical professional counselor intern pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
5. A person who is licensed to engage in social work pursuant
to chapter 641B of NRS;
6. A person who is licensed as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant pursuant to chapter 640A of NRS;
7. A person who is licensed as a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, licensed or certified as an alcohol and drug counselor or
certified as an alcohol and drug counselor intern, a clinical alcohol
and drug counselor intern, a problem gambling counselor or a
problem gambling counselor intern, pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
8. A person who provides or supervises the provision of peer
recovery support services in accordance with the provisions of NRS
433.622 to 433.641, inclusive [;] , and section 66 of this act;
9. A person who is licensed as a behavior analyst or an
assistant behavior analyst or registered as a registered behavior
technician pursuant to chapter 641D of NRS, while engaged in the
practice of applied behavior analysis as defined in NRS 641D.080;
or
10. Any member of the clergy,
 if such a person does not commit an act described in NRS
641.440 or represent himself or herself as a psychologist.
Sec. 86. NRS 641B.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641B.040 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. A physician who is licensed to practice in this State;
2. A nurse who is licensed to practice in this State;
3. A person who is licensed as a psychologist pursuant to
chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice psychology in this
State pursuant to the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
enacted in NRS 641.227;
4. A person who is licensed as a marriage and family therapist
or marriage and family therapist intern pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
5. A person who is licensed as a clinical professional counselor
or clinical professional counselor intern pursuant to chapter 641A of
NRS;
6. A person who is licensed as an occupational therapist or
occupational therapy assistant pursuant to chapter 640A of NRS;
-
*SB457_R1*

– 65 –
7. A person who is licensed as a clinical alcohol and drug
counselor, licensed or certified as an alcohol and drug counselor or
certified as a clinical alcohol and drug counselor intern, an alcohol
and drug counselor intern, a problem gambling counselor or a
problem gambling counselor intern, pursuant to chapter 641C of
NRS;
8. A person who provides or supervises the provision of peer
recovery support services in accordance with NRS 433.622 to
433.641, inclusive [;] , and section 66 of this act;
9. Any member of the clergy;
10. A county welfare director;
11. Any person who may engage in social work or clinical
social work in his or her regular governmental employment but does
not hold himself or herself out to the public as a social worker; or
12. A student of social work and any other person preparing for
the profession of social work under the supervision of a qualified
social worker in a training institution or facility recognized by the
Board, unless the student or other person has been issued a
provisional license pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS
641B.275. Such a student must be designated by the title “student of
social work” or “trainee in social work,” or any other title which
clearly indicates the student’s training status.
Sec. 87. NRS 641C.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
641C.130 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. A physician who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS;
2. A nurse who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
632 of NRS and is authorized by the State Board of Nursing to
engage in the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and other
substance use disorders or the practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling;
3. A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 641 of NRS or authorized to practice psychology in this
State pursuant to the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact
enacted in NRS 641.227;
4. A clinical professional counselor or clinical professional
counselor intern who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641A of NRS;
5. A marriage and family therapist or marriage and family
therapist intern who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of chapter
641A of NRS and is authorized by the Board of Examiners for
Marriage and Family Therapists and Clinical Professional
Counselors to engage in the practice of counseling persons with
alcohol and other substance use disorders or the practice of
counseling persons with an addictive disorder related to gambling;
6. A person who is:
-
*SB457_R1*

– 66 –
(a) Licensed as:
(1) A clinical social worker pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 641B of NRS; or
(2) A master social worker or an independent social worker
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 641B of NRS and is engaging
in clinical social work as part of an internship program approved by
the Board of Examiners for Social Workers; and
(b) Authorized by the Board of Examiners for Social Workers to
engage in the practice of counseling persons with alcohol and other
substance use disorders or the practice of counseling persons with
an addictive disorder related to gambling; or
7. A person who provides or supervises the provision of peer
recovery support services in accordance with NRS 433.622 to
433.641, inclusive [.] , or section 66 of this act.
Sec. 87.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Administrative Office of the Courts for the purpose of carrying out
the provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $919,080
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $948,695
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 87.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Department of Corrections for costs associated with carrying out the
provisions of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,242,145
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,915,779
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
-
*SB457_R1*

– 67 –
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 88. NRS 178.574 and 178.578 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 89. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
178.574 Order of immunity bar to prosecution; exception.
Such order of immunity shall forever be a bar to prosecution against
the witness for any offense shown in whole or in part by such
testimony or other evidence except for perjury committed in the
giving of such testimony.
178.578 Denial of motion. The court shall deny the motion
of the State under NRS 178.572 if it reasonably appears to the court
that such testimony or evidence would subject the witness to
prosecution, except for perjury committed in the giving of such
testimony, under the laws of another state or of the United States.
H
-
*SB457_R1*